Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.670

First-class districts having city with population of 400,000 people or more—Initial director district boundaries—Appointments to fill vacancies for new director districts—Director district numbers.

The school boards of any school district of the first class having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more shall establish the director district boundaries. Appointment of a board member to fill any vacancy existing for a new director district prior to the next regular school election shall be by the school board. Prior to the next regular election in the school district and the filing of declarations of candidacy therefor, the incumbent school board shall designate said director districts by number. Directors appointed to fill vacancies as above provided shall be subject to election, one for a six-year term, and one for a two-year term and thereafter the term of their respective successors shall be for four years. The term of office of incumbent members of the board of such district shall not be affected by RCW 28A.343.300, 28A.343.600, 28A.343.610, 28A.343.660, and this section. If the district is changing its director district boundaries under RCW 29A.92.040 or 29A.92.110, all director positions are subject to election at the next regular election.

[ 2019 c 454 s 3; 2015 c 53 s 15; 1995 c 335 s 106. Prior: 1991 c 363 s 29; 1991 c 288 ss 7, 8; prior: 1990 c 59 s 72; 1990 c 33 s 328; 1983 c 3 s 36; 1979 ex.s. c 183 s 7; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 6; 1969 c 131 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.315.680, 28A.57.435.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—Effective date—2019 c 454: See notes following RCW 29A.92.050.

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Effective dates—1991 c 363 ss 28, 29, 33, 47, and 131: See note following RCW 28A.343.660.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Effective date—1991 c 288 ss 6 and 8: See note following RCW 28A.343.660.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 183: See notes following RCW 28A.343.020.